src/morphology/stems/abbreviations.lexc
LEXICON ITRAB
3p+Use/Circ:3p ab-noun-itrab ;
abess:abess ab-noun-itrab ;
3-st ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
abstr ab-adj-itrab ;
adess:adess ab-noun-itrab ;
at ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
kan ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
adv ab-noun-itrab ;
advl ab-noun-itrab ;
akk ab-noun-itrab ;
akt ab-adv-itrab ;
all ab-noun-itrab ;
anat ab-dot-adj-itrab ; ! anatomalaš
attr ab-noun-itrab ;
b ab-adv-itrab ;
biol ab-dot-adj-itrab ;
bot ab-dot-adj-itrab ;
r ab-dot-adj-itrab ;
bto ab-dot-adv-itrab ;
c/o+Use/Circ:c/o ab-nodot-adv-itrab ;
ca ab-dot-adv-itrab ;
cc ab-dot-adv-itrab ;
cd ab-nodot-noun-itrab ;
cl ab-nodot-noun-itrab ;
cos ab-nodot-noun-itrab ;
cot ab-nodot-noun-itrab ;
dat ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
dB ab-nodot-noun-itrab ;
d.d ab-dot-adv-itrab ;
dem:dem ab-adj-itrab ;
b%:n:b%:n ab-nodot-adv-itrab ;
dept ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
n.j ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
dl ab-nodot-noun-itrab ;
elat ab-nodot-noun-itrab ;
dm³ ab-nodot-noun-itrab ;
do ab-dot-adv-itrab ;
dub ab-dot-adv-itrab ;
dus ab-dot-adv-itrab ;
ess ab-noun-itrab ;
etc ab-dot-adv-itrab ;
euf ab-dot-adv-itrab ;
ff ab-adv-itrab ;
fin ab-noun-itrab ;
fol ab-dot-adv-itrab ;
gen ab-noun-itrab ;
geogr ab-dot-adj-itrab ; ! geografiijas
geom ab-dot-adj-itrab ; ! geometrihkala ! š
ggl ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
gl.rs ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
ha ab-nodot-noun-itrab ;
hl ab-nodot-noun-itrab ;
ib ab-nodot-adv-itrab ;
ibid ab-nodot-adv-itrab ;
imp ab-noun-itrab ;
impers ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
imprt ab-noun-itrab ;
inf ab-noun-itrab ;
ing ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
interr ab-dot-adj-itrab ;
intr ab-dot-adj-itrab ;
j.d ab-dot-adv-itrab ;
j.d.s ab-dot-adv-itrab ;
j.e ab-dot-adv-itrab ;
j.s ab-dot-adv-itrab ;
jdd ab-dot-adv-itrab ;
jed ab-dot-adv-itrab ;
jna ab-adv-itrab ; ! ja nu ain
j.n.v ab-dot-adv-itrab ; ! ja nav vijdábun ! jïh nimhtie vijriebasse
jnv ab-adv-itrab ; ! jïh nimhtie vijriebasse
ts ab-adv-itrab ; ! tsåahka
bj ab-dot-adv-itrab ; ! biejjie
jr ab-noun-itrab ; ! junior
jur ab-dot-adj-itrab ; ! juridihkalaš
jv ab-adv-itrab ;
kg ab-nodot-noun-itrab ;
km ab-nodot-noun-itrab ; ! kg3 or kg, that's the question.
km³ ab-nodot-noun-itrab ;
km3 ab-nodot-noun-itrab ;
cm2 ab-nodot-noun-itrab ;
komp ab-noun-itrab ;
konj ab-noun-itrab ;! konjunksjon?
konkr ab-dot-adj-itrab ; ! konkrehta
kvm ab-nodot-noun-itrab ;
kW ab-nodot-noun-itrab ;
Lohk ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
lok ab-dot-noun-itrab ; ! lokatiiva
m ab-noun-itrab ;
m.fl ab-dot-adv-itrab ;
matem ab-dot-adj-itrab ; ! matematihkalaš
mg ab-nodot-noun-itrab ;
milj ab-num-itrab ;
miljo ab-dot-num-itrab ;
mill ab-num-itrab ; ! But this is also used with dot
mKr ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
mm ab-nodot-noun-itrab ;
mm³ ab-nodot-noun-itrab ;
mrd ab-num-itrab ;
m³ ab-nodot-noun-itrab ;
od.prp ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
oKr ab-dot-adv-itrab ;
partit ab-dot-noun-itrab ; ! partitiiva
pl ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
pot ab-noun-itrab ;
pron ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
pst ab-noun-itrab ;
refl ab-adj-itrab ;
rel ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
relat ab-dot-adj-itrab ; ! relatiiva
s.v ab-dot-adv-itrab ;
sg ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
sup ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
tan ab-noun-itrab ; ! tangeansa
transl ab-dot-noun-itrab ;
LEXICON TRAB
anár ab-dot-adj-trab ; ! anársámegiella
Avd.dir ab-dot-noun-trab ; ! Advelingsdirektør
bs ab-dot-verb-trab ;
cand.oecon ab-dot-noun-trab ;
dbm ab-dot-noun-trab ;
dr.philos ab-dot-noun-trab ;
et ab-nodot-adv-trab ;
min ab-nodot-noun-trab ;
GWh ab-noun-trab ;
j.g ab-dot-adv-trab ;
Jak ab-dot-noun-trab ;
lix ab-nodot-noun-trab ;
med ab-dot-noun-trab ;
åss ab-dot-noun-trab ;
pic ab-noun-trab ;
pp ab-dot-noun-trab ;
pta ab-nodot-noun-trab ;
rbl ab-nodot-noun-trab ;
vol ab-dot-noun-trab ;
ea ab-adv-trab ;
ea.ea ab-adv-trab ; ! 15 %- ea.ea without final dot.
eren ab-dot-adj-trab ;
ex ab-noun-trab ;
eŋg ab-dot-noun-adj-trab ;
fax ab-dot-noun-trab ;
germ ab-dot-adj-trab ;
H.K.H ab-dot-noun-trab ; ! Hans/hennes kongelige høyhet
inkl ab-dot-adj-trab ;
i.s ab-dot-adv-trab ;
Joh:Joh ab-noun-trab ; ! Johannes
kapt ab-dot-noun-trab ;
lnr ab-dot-noun-trab ;
Luk ab-noun-trab ; ! Lukas
mrs ab-dot-noun-trab ;
obl ab-dot-adj-trab ;
Od.prop ab-dot-noun-trab ; ! Odeldikkeproposišuvdna
Od ab-nodot-noun-trab ; ! Odelstinget
Ot.prop ab-noun-trab ;
Ot.prop.nr ab-noun-trab ; ! Odelstingsproposisjon nummer
Ot.prp ab-noun-trab ;
Ot.prp.nr ab-noun-trab ; ! Odelstingsproposisjon nummer
Oth.prop ab-noun-trab ; ! h?
Oth.prp ab-noun-trab ;
overs ab-dot-noun-trab ; ! oversatt, oversetter
pharm ab-dot-adj-trab ;
pol ab-dot-adj-trab ;
polit ab-dot-adj-trab ;
priv ab-dot-adj-trab ;
pro ab-noun-trab ;
psyk ab-dot-adj-trab ;
resipr ab-dot-adj-trab ; ! resiprohka TRAB or ITRAB?
Rom:Rom ab-noun-trab ; ! Girje romalaččaide
Sd ab-noun-trab ;
Sd.dieđ.nr ab-noun-trab ; ! Stuorradikkedieđahus nummer
Sd.prp ab-noun-trab ;
St ab-noun-trab ;
St.died ab-noun-trab ;
St.meld.nr ab-noun-trab ;
St.prp ab-noun-trab ; ! Stortingsproposisjon
arkijveaamhtesnr ab-noun-trab ;
su ab-dot-adv-trab ; ! sullii
sugr ab-dot-adj-trab ; ! suoma-ugralaš
tel ab-dot-noun-trab ;
urál ab-dot-adj-trab ; ! urálalaš
vs ab-dot-cc-trab ;
C+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:C ab-nodot-noun-trab ;
G+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:G ab-nodot-noun-trab ;
K+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:K ab-nodot-noun-trab ;
O+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:O ab-nodot-noun-trab ;
S+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:S ab-nodot-noun-trab ;
W+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:W ab-nodot-noun-trab ;
Æ+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:Æ ab-nodot-noun-trab ;
Ö+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:Ö ab-nodot-noun-trab ;
Ŧ+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:Ŧ ab-nodot-noun-trab ;
ž+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:ž ab-nodot-noun-trab ;
ŧ+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:ŧ ab-nodot-noun-trab ;
d+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:d ab-nodot-noun-trab ;
h+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:h ab-nodot-noun-trab ;
p+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:p ab-nodot-noun-trab ;
x+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:x ab-nodot-noun-trab ;
č+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:č ab-nodot-noun-trab ;
M+Use/SpellNoSugg:M ab-dot-noun-trab ;
Å+Use/SpellNoSugg:Å ab-dot-noun-trab ;
b+Use/SpellNoSugg:b ab-dot-noun-trab ;
r+Use/SpellNoSugg:r ab-dot-noun-trab ;
